South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3273.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 41 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 41-1-140.  If a nonprofit corporation located in this State has an annual gross revenue exceeding one billion dollars, then: (1) any covenant not to compete between the nonprofit corporation and any of its current or former employees is null and void and unenforceable; and (2) no covenant not to compete may be part of a contract with a future employee. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----